Indiana, session 2026, HB1229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-3-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 15. (a) Each taxable
year, an individual who:
(1) is:
(A) a citizen or national of the United States; or
(B) an alien who has lawful permanent resident status or
conditional permanent resident status; and
(2) paid any fees under IC 28-8-4.1-707 for a money
transmission transaction during the taxable year;
is entitled to an international money wiring fee credit against the
individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for the taxable year.
(b) The amount of the credit is equal to the total amount of
international money wiring fees the individual paid during the
taxable year.
(c) To receive the credit provided by this section, an individual
must claim the credit on the individual's state tax return or returns
2026 IN 1229—LS 6901/DI 120


in the manner prescribed by the department. The individual shall
submit to the department all information that the department
determines is necessary for the calculation of the credit provided
by this section.
(d) The credit provided by this section may not exceed the
amount of the individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for
the taxable year, reduced by the sum of all credits for the taxable
year that are applied before the application of the credit provided
by this section. The amount of any unused credit under this section
for a taxable year may not be carried forward to a succeeding
taxable year, carried back to a preceding taxable year, or
refunded.
SECTION 2. IC 12-11-1.1-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2016,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The office may assess providers of
community based services to individuals with a developmental
disability who otherwise qualify to receive ICF/IID (as defined in
IC 16-29-4-2) based services in an amount not to exceed six percent
(6%) of all service revenue included on the annual plan of care
excluding resident living allowances.
(b) The assessments shall be paid to the office not later than the
tenth day of the month for each month that the individual is in service.
The office or the office's designee may withhold Medicaid payments to
a provider described in subsection (a) that fails to pay an assessment
within thirty (30) days after the due date. The amount withheld may not
exceed the amount of the assessments due.
(c) The community based services quality assurance fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the office.
(d) The fund consists of the following two (2) funding sources:
(1) Revenue from the assessments under this section shall be
deposited into the fund.
(2) Revenue from the international money wiring fee
deposited in the fund under IC 28-8-4.1-707(c)(2).
(e) Money deposited in the fund under subsection (d)(1) must be
used for community services for persons with developmental
disabilities.
(f) Subject to subsection (g), money deposited in the fund under
subsection (d)(2) must be used to fund the family supports
Medicaid waiver and community integration habilitation Medicaid
waiver programs, including applied behavior analysis, in order to
reduce the wait list and make additional waiver slots available
under those two (2) programs.
2026 IN 1229—LS 6901/DI 120


(g) The following apply to money deposited in the fund under
subsection (d)(2):
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the money may, after review by the
budget committee, be used for the purposes under subjection
(f).
(2) Fifty percent (50%) of the money is not subject to review
by the budget committee and may be used for the purposes
under subjection (f) any time following the deposit of the
money in the fund.
(e) (h) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(f) (i) If federal financial participation to match the assessments in
subsection (a) becomes unavailable under federal law, the authority to
impose the assessments under subsection (a) terminates on the date
that the federal statutory, regulatory, or interpretive change takes effect.
SECTION 3. IC 28-8-4.1-707 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 707. (a) A licensee shall collect an
international money wiring fee from the sender of a money
transmission transaction if the recipient of the money is located
outside of the United States. The amount of the fee is:
(1) in the case of a transaction in which the transmission is in
an amount of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), five
dollars ($5); and
(2) in the case of a transaction in which the transmission is in
an amount greater than five hundred dollars ($500), the sum
of:
(A) five dollars ($5); plus
(B) an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the amount
of the transmission that exceeds five hundred dollars
($500).
(b) A licensee shall remit the fee collections under subsection (a)
to the department quarterly. The licensee shall remit the fees
collected during a particular quarter before the fifteenth day of the
month immediately following the last month of the quarter. At the
time the fees are remitted, the licensee shall file a return on a form
prescribed by the department.
(c) The following apply regarding amounts collected under this
section:
(1) Twenty percent (20%) of the amounts collected shall be
deposited in the state general fund.
(2) Eighty percent (80%) of the amounts collected shall be
2026 IN 1229—LS 6901/DI 120


deposited in the community based services fund under
IC 12-11-1.1-10(d)(2).
(d) The department shall prescribe a notice with a statement
including information that an individual who:
(1) is:
(A) a citizen or national of the United States; or
(B) an alien who has lawful permanent resident status or
conditional permanent resident status;
(2) has a valid Social Security number; and
(3) files an Indiana individual adjusted gross income tax
return;
may be eligible for the international money wiring fee tax credit
provided under IC 6-3-3-15. Each licensee and each of the
licensee's delegates shall post the notice prescribed by the
department.
(e) Each licensee that is required to remit the fee under this
section is entitled to deduct and retain from the amount of those
fees otherwise required to be remitted, if timely remitted, a
collection allowance equal to seventy-three hundredths percent
(0.73%) of the fee amounts remitted under this section.
SECTION 4. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]
(a) IC 6-3-3-15, as added by this act, applies to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2025.
(b) This SECTION expires June 30, 2030.
SECTION 5. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1229—LS 6901/DI 120